District of Columbia statutes.
1-617.14

Timeliness of decisions.

All decisions of the Board shall be rendered within a reasonable period of time, and in no event later than 120 days after the matter is submitted or referred to it for a decision.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1714, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-618.14.
1973 Ed., § 1-347.14.